Maine, session 132, LD14.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1819-C is enacted to read:
§1819-C. Free admission for members of federally recognized Indian nation, tribe or
band
Notwithstanding section 1819, a member of a federally recognized Indian nation, tribe
or band in this State is not required to pay a fee for admission to any state-owned park,
historic site, camping area or beach managed by the State. To qualify for free admission
under this section, a person shall present a qualifying tribal identification, as approved by
the respective tribal government, to the bureau staff on duty or other designee of the
director.
Page 1 - 132LR0045(03)